California statutes. Public Resources Code
(b) An affidavit recorded as required by subdivision (a), or a copy thereof duly certified by the county recorder, shall be prima facie evidence of the performance of the labor, the making of the improvements, or the payment of the maintenance fee as stated in the affidavit.

(c) (1) The neglect or failure of the owner of any mining claim to record, or cause to be
 recorded, within the time allowed by this section an affidavit containing the statements required by subdivision (a) creates a prima facie presumption of the act and intent of the owner to abandon the claim at the end of the assessment year within which the labor should have been performed, the improvements should have been made, or the maintenance fee should have been paid under the laws of the United States, and imposes the burden of proof upon the owner of the claim to show that the labor has been performed, that the improvements have been made, or that the maintenance fee has been paid in any contest, suit, or proceeding touching the title to the claim.

(2) If the
 affidavit is executed and recorded by anyone other than an owner within the 30-day period, and the owner apprehends that there are deficiencies in the recorded affidavit, he or she may supplement the recorded affidavit by further affidavit to comply with the section and may record the supplemental affidavit within 30 days following the last day of the 30-day period after the time required by law for performance of the work, making of improvements, or payment of the maintenance fee, and thereby obtain the prima facie evidence of the performance of labor, the making of improvements, or the payment of the maintenance fee, and avoid the prima facie presumption of abandonment and the burden of proving the performance of labor, the making of improvements, or the payment of the maintenance fee required by law.

(d) Any person who willfully makes a false statement with respect to any mining claim on the affidavit required by subdivision (a), or on the
 supplementary affidavit permitted by subdivision (c), is guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2016, Ch. 95, Sec. 1.   (AB 1734)   Effective January 1, 2017.)
-------------------------------------------

3914.

The board of supervisors, may require, by resolution, that any person filing an affidavit pursuant to Section 3913 or any person filing a notice of intent to hold, demonstrate proof of payment of any unsecured tax levied against the mining claim on which the affidavit or notice of intent to hold is filed, along with any delinquent unsecured taxes levied against the person filing the affidavit or notice of intent to hold, prior to the recordation of the affidavit or notice of intent to hold.

If a resolution is adopted by the board of supervisors pursuant to this section, it may include the following provisions, and any other provisions determined by the board as necessary to carry out the intent of this section:

(a) A provision prohibiting the county recorder from accepting the affidavit or notice of intent to hold for recordation without the tax collector’s certification that the taxes have been paid.

(b) A provision requiring the following:

(1) That, when taxes are paid, the tax collector issue a receipt or certificate of payment for use in certification of the affidavit or notice of intent to hold.

(2) That the county recorder forward the affidavit or notice of intent to hold to the tax collector if the county recorder receives an affidavit for recording by mail and the affidavit or notice of intent to hold does not contain the tax collector’s certification that the taxes have been paid.

(3) That, if applicable, the tax collector then certify that the taxes have been paid on the face of the affidavit or notice of intent to hold and return the document to the county recorder for recording.

(4) That, if the taxes have not been paid, the tax collector return the affidavit unrecorded to the filer.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1990, Ch. 992, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

3915.

(a) The following are the only monuments which may be used pursuant to this chapter: 

(1) A wooden post not less than 112 inches in diameter projecting at least two feet above the ground. 

(2) A mound of stone projecting at least two feet above the ground. 

(3) A nonperforated, capped metal post or solid metal rod, not less than one inch in diameter and projecting at least two feet above the ground. 

(b) Where, by reason of precipitous ground, it is impractical or dangerous to place a monument in its true position, a witness monument may be erected as near thereto as the nature of the ground will permit and marked so as to identify the true position. 

(c) Where, by reason of working the claim, it is impractical or dangerous to maintain a monument in its true position, a witness monument shall be erected as near thereto as the nature of the ground will permit and marked so as to identify the true position. 

(d) Any person using on January 1, 1992, or who has previously erected, any monument or object other than those defined in this section for the purposes of this chapter shall have until January 1, 1995, to comply with this section or remove those monuments which are not in compliance. 

(e) Within 180 days of abandonment, relinquishment, or loss of a claim, in effect on January 1, 1992, all monuments pertaining to that claim shall be permanently removed by the locator. A person who violates this subdivision shall be subject to a fine of not more than fifty dollars ($50) for each monument which is not removed and additionally liable for any cost incurred by the federal, state, or county government agency which removes any monument or has it removed.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1991, Ch. 494, Sec. 3.)
-------------------------------------------

3916.

Any person who takes down, removes, alters, or destroys any stake, post, monument, or notice of location upon any mining claim which is required by law to be upon the mining claim, without the consent of the owner thereof, shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than two hundred dollars ($200) or by imprisonment in the county jail for not more than six months, or by both the fine and imprisonment.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3917.

Whenever a coowner or coowners of a mining claim give to a delinquent coowner or coowners the notice in writing or notice by publication provided for in Section 2324 of the Revised Statutes of the United States, an affidavit of the person giving the notice, stating the time, place, manner of service, and by whom and upon whom service was made, shall be attached to a true copy of the notice.

The notice and affidavit shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder, in books kept for that purpose, in the county in which the claim is situated, within 90 days, after the giving of the notice. For recording the notice and affidavit, the recorder shall receive the same fees as are allowed by law for recording deeds.

If the notice is given by publication in a newspaper, there shall be attached to a printed copy of the notice an affidavit of the printer or his or her foreman, or principal clerk of the newspaper, stating the date of the first, last, and each insertion of the notice therein, and where the newspaper was published during that time, and the name of the newspaper. The affidavit and notice shall be recorded within 180 days after the first publication thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3918.

The original of the notice and affidavit, or a duly certified copy of the record thereof, shall be prima facie evidence that the delinquent mentioned in Section 2324 of the Revised Statutes of the United States has failed or refused to contribute his or her proportion of the expenditure required by that section, and of the service of publication of the notice, unless the writing or affidavit specified in Section 3919 is of record.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3919.

If the delinquent, within the 90 days required by Section 2324 of the Revised Statutes of the United States, contributes to his or her coowner or coowners his or her proportion of the expenditures and also all costs of service of the notice required by Section 3917, whether incurred for publication charges or otherwise, the coowner or coowners shall sign and deliver to the delinquent or delinquents a writing, stating that the delinquent or delinquents by name has, within the time required by that Section 2324, contributed his or her share for the year ____, upon the ____ mine, and further stating therein the district, county, and state wherein the claim is situated, and the book and page where the location notice is recorded, if the claim was located under this chapter. The writing shall be recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county, for which he or she shall receive the same fees as are allowed by law for recording deeds.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3920.

If the coowner fails to sign and deliver the writing to the delinquent within 20 days after the contribution, the coowner so failing is liable to the delinquent for a penalty of one hundred dollars ($100) to be recovered by the delinquent in any court of competent jurisdiction. If the coowner fails to deliver the writing within 20 days after the contribution, the delinquent, with two disinterested persons having personal knowledge of the contribution, may make an affidavit setting forth in what manner, the amount of, to whom, and upon what claim, the contribution was made. The affidavit, or a record thereof in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the claim is situated, is prima facie evidence of the contribution.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3921.

The record of any location of a mining claim, millsite, or tunnel right in the office of the county recorder, as provided in this chapter, shall be received in evidence and have the same force and effect in the courts of the state as the original notice.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3922.

Copies of the records of all instruments required to be recorded by this chapter, duly certified by the recorder in whose custody the records are, may be read in evidence under the same circumstances and rules as are provided by law for using copies of instruments relating to real estate, duly executed or acknowledged or proved and recorded.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3923.

This chapter does not in any manner affect or abolish any mining district or the rules and regulations thereof within the state.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3924.

Whenever any mining district in this state, organized or created under the laws of the United States, is dissolved, the officers or custodians of the records of the mining district shall deposit with the county recorder of the county, in which the district is located, all records of location notices or other documents affecting titles to mining claims in the mining district, shown by the records of the district.

County recorders of the counties shall accept any location notices and other documents affecting title to mining claims of dissolved mining districts. Thereafter all notices and documents shall be open for public inspection.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 2. Mining Partnerships [3940. - 3950.]

3940.

A mining partnership exists when two or more persons who own or acquire a mining claim for the purpose of working it and extracting the mineral therefrom actually engage in working the claim. To the extent not inconsistent with this chapter, mining partnerships shall be governed in the same manner as other general partnerships would be governed pursuant to Section 16111 of the Corporations Code, by the Uniform Partnership Act (Chapter 1 (commencing with Section 15001) of Title 2 of the Corporations Code), or the Uniform Partnership Act of 1994 (Chapter 5 (commencing with Section 16100) of Title 2 of the Corporations Code).

(History: Amended by Stats. 1996, Ch. 1003, Sec. 3.   Effective January 1, 1997.)
-------------------------------------------

3941.

An express agreement to become partners or to share the profits and losses of mining is not necessary to the formation or existence of a mining partnership. The relation arises from the ownership of shares or interests in a mine and working it for the purpose of extracting the minerals therefrom.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3942.

A member of a mining partnership shares in the profits and losses thereof in the proportion which the interest or share he or she owns in the mine bears to the whole partnership capital or whole number of shares.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3943.

Each member of a mining partnership has a lien on the partnership property for the debts due the creditors thereof, and for money advanced by him or her for its use. This lien exists notwithstanding that there is an agreement among the partners that it shall not.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3944.

The mining-ground owned and worked by partners in mining, whether purchased with partnership funds or not, is partnership property.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3945.

One of the partners in a mining partnership may convey his or her interest in the mine and business without dissolving the partnership. The purchaser, from the date of his or her purchase, becomes a member of the partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3946.

A purchaser of an interest in the mining-ground of a mining partnership takes it subject to the liens existing in favor of the partners for debts due all creditors thereof, or advances made for the benefit of the partnership, unless he or she purchased in good faith, for a valuable consideration, without notice of that lien.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3947.

A purchaser of the interest of a partner in a mine when the partnership is engaged in working it, takes with notice of all liens resulting from the relation of the partners to each other and to the creditors of the partnership.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3948.

No member of a mining partnership or other agent or manager thereof can, by a contract in writing, bind the partnership, except by express authority derived from the members thereof.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3949.

The decision of the members owning a majority of the shares or interests in a mining partnership binds it in the conduct of its business.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3950.

This chapter does not apply to any operations for the extraction of oil, gas, and other hydrocarbons.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 3. Placer Mining Water Pollution [3960. - 3968.]

3960.

This chapter does not apply to any placer mine operator who holds a permit to operate from the California Debris Commission.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3961.

Any person, firm, or corporation who engages in the operation of a placer mine on any stream or on the watershed of any stream tributary directly or indirectly to the Sacramento River or the San Joaquin River shall record a verified statement in the office of the county recorder of the county in which his or her mine is situated, within 30 days after the commencement of operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3962.

The verified statement shall be verified by the operator or by someone in his or her behalf and shall contain all of the following information:

(a) A description of the ground proposed to be mined by placer mining methods, described by United States government subdivisions if possible.

(b) The names and addresses of the owners of the ground.

(c) The names and addresses of the operators of the mine.

(d) The proposed means or method of placer mining operation.

(e) The means which the operator proposes to use to prevent the pollution of any stream by the effluent from the operations.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3963.

Within 10 days after an owner or operator changes his or her address, or transfers the ownership or changes the operator of any mining property, a notice setting forth the names and addresses of the new owners or operators shall be filed in the office of the county recorder.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3964.

No placer mining operator shall mine by the placer process on any stream or on the watershed of any stream tributary directly or indirectly to the Sacramento River or the San Joaquin River without taking both of the following precautions to prevent pollution of the stream by the effluent from his or her operations:

(a) Constructing a settling pond or ponds of sufficient size to permit the clarification of water used in the mining processes before the water is discharged into the stream.

(b) Mixing with the effluent from mining operations aluminum sulphate and lime, or an equivalent clarifying substance which will cause the solid material in the effluent to coagulate and thus avoid rendering the water in the stream unfit for domestic water supply purposes.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3965.

Notwithstanding subdivision (b) of Section 3964, any placer miner who is operating by dredging process, and who desires to transport his or her dredger across a stream, may conduct the dredger across the stream without constructing a settling pond, if he or she is of the opinion that the expense of constructing settling ponds in the stream would be unduly heavy.

Before transporting the dredger, the operator shall use the following procedure:

(a) He or she shall give a notice of the intent to cross a stream to the clerk or the secretary of each city or district owning or operating a domestic water supply whose clarity is likely to be affected by the crossing operation.

(b) The notice shall be given at least seven days in advance of the date that he or she expects to cross the stream with the dredger.

(c) Upon the expiration of the notice, the operator may, during the following 48 hours, conduct the dredger across the stream even though some turbidity may be caused by the crossing operation.

(d) After crossing the stream, the operator shall comply with subdivision (b) of Section 3964.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3966.

Any person, firm, or corporation who violates this chapter is guilty of a misdemeanor.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3967.

The operation of any placer mine on ground not covered by a permit issued to the operator from the California Debris Commission, without compliance with this chapter, is declared to be a public nuisance which may be enjoined upon suit brought by the district attorney of the county in which the operation has been conducted, or by any city or district whose domestic water supply is rendered unfit or dangerous for human consumption by the acts, or failure to act, of the operator.

The superior court of the county in which the operation is conducted has jurisdiction to hear and determine the action and to award relief as may be proper.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3968.

Nothing in this chapter deprives the state, any city, county, district, person, firm, or corporation of any right to maintain any action or proceeding, in any jurisdiction, which it was entitled to maintain prior to April 8, 1953, or to receive or obtain in the action any remedy accorded to it under existing law.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



CHAPTER 4. Miscellaneous Provisions [3980. - 3985.]

3980.

Sluice boxes, flumes, hose, pipes, railway tracks, cars, blacksmith shops, mills, and all other machinery or tools used in working or developing a mine, are deemed affixed to the mine.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3981.

The business of hydraulic mining may be carried on within the state wherever and whenever it can be carried on without material injury to navigable streams or the lands adjacent thereto.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3982.

“Hydraulic mining,” as used in Section 3981, is mining by means of the application of water, under pressure, through a nozzle, against a natural bank.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3983.

Any corporation organized in this state for the purpose of mining or carrying on mining operations in or outside this state, may establish and maintain agencies in other states, for the transfer and issuing of its shares. A transfer or issue of the shares of the corporation at any of its transfer agencies, in accordance with its bylaws, is valid and binding as fully and effectually for all purposes as if made upon the books of the corporation at its principal office within this state. The transfer agencies shall be governed by the bylaws and the directors of the corporation.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3984.

Any shareholder of a corporation formed under the laws of this state for the purpose of mining, may visit, accompanied by his or her expert, and examine the mines owned by the corporation, and every part thereof, at any time he or she may see fit.

When the shareholder applies to the president of the corporation, the president shall immediately cause the secretary thereof to issue and deliver to the shareholder an order, under the seal of the corporation, directed to the superintendent, commanding him or her to show and exhibit parts of the mines that the shareholder named in the order may desire to visit and examine. The superintendent, on receiving the order, shall furnish the shareholder every facility for making a full and complete inspection of the mines, and of the workings therein, and shall either accompany the shareholder in person or furnish some person familiar with the mines to accompany the shareholder in the visit to and through the mines and every part thereof.

If the superintendent fails to obey the order, the shareholder may recover, in any court of competent jurisdiction, against the corporation, the sum of one thousand dollars ($1,000) and traveling expenses to and from the mine, as liquidated damages, together with costs of suit. In case of a refusal, the directors of the corporation shall immediately remove the officer so refusing, and thereafter he or she shall not be employed directly or indirectly by the corporation and shall not be paid any salary.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------

3985.

All grubstake contracts and prospecting agreements entered into after September 19, 1939, and which may in any way affect the title of mining locations, or other locations under the mining laws of this state, shall be void and of no effect unless the instrument has first been recorded in the office of the county recorder of the county in which the instrument is made. The instrument shall be duly acknowledged before a notary public or other person competent to take acknowledgments. Grubstake contracts and prospecting agreements, duly acknowledged and recorded as provided for in this section, shall be prima facie evidence in all courts in this state in all cases where the title to mining locations and other locations under the mining laws of this state are in dispute.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 259, Sec. 11.)
-------------------------------------------



======================================================================

DIVISION 4. FORESTS, FORESTRY AND RANGE AND FORAGE LANDS [4001. - 4958.]



PART 1. DEFINITIONS AND GENERAL PROVISIONS [4001. - 4053.]



  CHAPTER 1. Definitions [4001. - 4005.]

4001.

Unless the context otherwise requires, the definitions in this chapter govern the construction of this division.

(History: Added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.

“Board” means the State Board of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1998, Ch. 972, Sec. 16.   Effective January 1, 1999.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.4.

“Cultural burn” or “cultural burning” means the intentional application of fire to land by a California Native American tribe, a tribal organization, or a cultural fire practitioner to achieve cultural goals or objectives, including for sustenance, ceremonial activities, biodiversity, or other benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 666, Sec. 2.   (SB 310)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4002.6.

“Cultural fire practitioner” means a person recognized by a California Native American tribe or tribal organization with substantial experience in burning to meet cultural goals or objectives, including for sustenance, ceremonial activities, biodiversity, or other benefits.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2024, Ch. 666, Sec. 3.   (SB 310)   Effective January 1, 2025.)
-------------------------------------------

4003.

“Department” means the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 150.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.

“Director” means the Director of Forestry and Fire Protection.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1988, Ch. 160, Sec. 151.)
-------------------------------------------

4004.5.

“Prescribed grazing” means the lawful application of grazing by a specific kind of livestock at a determined season, duration, and intensity to accomplish defined vegetation or conservation goals, including reducing the risk of wildfire by reducing fuel loads, controlling undesirable or invasive plants, and promoting biodiversity and habitat for special status species. Prescribed grazing may involve any or multiple kinds of livestock.

(History: Added by Stats. 2023, Ch. 519, Sec. 1.   (AB 297)   Effective January 1, 2024.)
-------------------------------------------

4005.

(a) “Wildfire and Forest Resilience Task Force” means the task force established by the Governor to oversee the implementation of Executive Order No. B-52-18.

(b) Any reference in any law or regulation to the Forest Management Task Force is deemed to, instead, refer to the Wildfire and Forest Resilience Task Force.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 387, Sec. 1.   (SB 456)   Effective January 1, 2022.)
-------------------------------------------



  CHAPTER 2. General Provisions [4021. - 4053.]



  ARTICLE 1. Penalties [4021. - 4022.]

4021.

Except as otherwise provided, the willful or negligent commission of any of the acts prohibited or the omission of any of the acts required by Chapter 2 (commencing with Section 4251) to Chapter 6 (commencing with Section 4411), inclusive, of Part 2 of this division is a misdemeanor.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1972, Ch. 618.)
-------------------------------------------

4022.

(a) The titles of ranger, park ranger, and forest ranger, and derivations thereof, may only be used by persons who are peace officers under Chapter 4.5 (commencing with Section 830) of Title 3 of Part 2 of the Penal Code, employees of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, or employees of the Department of Parks and Recreation classified as State Park Ranger (Permanent Intermittent). Any person, other than a peace officer or employee of the Department of Parks and Recreation, as described in this section, or employee of the Department of Forestry and Fire Protection, who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses any authorized badge, insignia, emblem, device, label, title, or card of a ranger, park ranger, forest ranger, or a derivation thereof, to identify the person as a ranger, park ranger, or forest ranger, or who willfully wears, exhibits, or uses any badge, insignia, emblem, device, label, title, or card of a ranger, park ranger, or forest ranger, which so resembles the authorized version that it would deceive an ordinary, reasonable person into believing that it is authorized for the use of a ranger, park ranger, or forest ranger, is guilty of a infraction.

(b) Subdivision (a) does not apply to positions and titles of agencies of the United States government or to any local agency which is officially using any title specified in subdivision (a) as of January 1, 1990.

(History: Added by Stats. 1989, Ch. 351, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 2. Purchase of Land [4031. - 4034.]

4031.

(a) The department may, with the approval of the Department of General Services, enter into agreements, easements, licenses, or permits to acquire real property rights for the purposes of establishing fire protection, fire prevention, fire suppression, demonstration state forests, pest control, forest and range protection, and enhancement activities and related uses in accordance with subdivisions (b) and (c).

(b) All agreements, easements, licenses, or permits entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) shall be for no more than fair market value.

(c) The Department of General Services shall sign all applicable
 certificates of acceptance entered into pursuant to subdivision (a) in accordance with Section 27281 of the Government Code.

(d) This section does not allow the department to purchase land for lookout sites or other administrative purposes.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2012, Ch. 306, Sec. 1.   (AB 2544)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4032.

(a) The department may lease, for any use, all or any portion of any parcel of real property acquired for forestry and fire protection purposes if the director finds that the use would be compatible with the department’s use.

(b) Rent shall be based on the fair market value of the property when used for the purpose for which it is leased.

(c) The lease term shall not exceed 5 years. All leases entered into pursuant to this section shall be subject to the approval of the Department of General Services.

(d) No lease shall be entered into that extends beyond the 5-year period
 unless the Legislature has reviewed and approved the proposed lease as part of the annual budget process, or the Public Works Board has determined that the proposed lease could not have been presented to the Legislature for review and approval in the course of its consideration of the Budget Bill and that it would be adverse to the interests of the public to defer that review and approval to a time when the Legislature next considers a Budget Bill. Upon making that determination, the board may review and approve the proposed lease after giving at least 20 days’ written notice to the Chairperson of the Joint Legislative Budget Committee and to the chairperson of the fiscal and appropriate policy committees of its intended action. All actions taken by the board pursuant to this subdivision shall be reported to the Legislature in the next Governor’s Budget.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 306, Sec. 2.   (AB 2544)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------

4033.

(a) The department may provide permits for temporary means of ingress to, egress from, and movement across all property under the jurisdiction of the department in order to provide ready access for the purposes of harvesting timber, conducting studies, and passing and placing equipment upon the department’s lands.

(b) The department may grant a permit for a right-of-way across the department’s lands over that route and subject to those conditions and construction and maintenance specifications as the department may determine that will cause minimum alteration to the physical features of the department’s lands and minimum interference with the use of the forests by the public.

(c) The permittee shall, at the permittee’s own expense, construct and maintain the means of ingress and egress, in accordance with the terms and conditions set forth in the permit, noncompliance with which in any part shall be due cause for revocation of that permit.

(d) The department may require a permittee or permittees to allow the use of those temporary means of ingress and egress by any other applicant whose lands are similarly situated.

(e) The department may, at its discretion, charge a reasonable fee for access to its lands.

(f) (1) A permit granted for passage pursuant to this section is temporary and does not imply consent
 to a permanent easement, and the permit shall include language stating this.

(2) The permits are and shall be revocable at any time.

(History: Amended by Stats. 2021, Ch. 133, Sec. 49.   (SB 272)   Effective July 23, 2021.)
-------------------------------------------

4034.

The department, with the consent of the Department of General Services, may lease any real or personal property that the department deems necessary for temporary use of fire station facilities, modular facilities, storage, warehouse, or office purposes when existing departmental facilities are inadequate. This section does not apply when the Department of General Services leases land for the use of the department under Section 14669 of the Government Code.

(History: Added by Stats. 2012, Ch. 306, Sec. 4.   (AB 2544)   Effective January 1, 2013.)
-------------------------------------------



  ARTICLE 3. CAL-FIRE Infrastructure Projects Revolving Fund [4050. - 4053.]

4050.

As used in this article, “fund” shall mean the CAL-FIRE Infrastructure Projects Revolving Fund.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 31, Sec. 20.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4051.

(a) The CAL-FIRE Infrastructure Projects Revolving Fund is hereby established in the State Treasury. Upon approval of the Department of Finance, there shall be transferred to the fund any money appropriated by the Legislature for encumbrance or expenditure on a project the department is authorized to perform with respect to acquisition of real property or the design, construction, alteration, repair, and improvement of facilities over which the department has jurisdiction, including equipment and furnishings within the approved project scope. Moneys transferred to the fund are encumbered as of the date of the transfer.

(b) If the federal government has agreed to provide funding for all or a portion of a project, as described in subdivision (a),
 the Department of Finance may authorize the department to expend money in the fund to pay the costs that will be reimbursed by the federal government under both of the following conditions:

(1) Receipt of written evidence that an appropriation has been made by the Congress of the United States and the appropriate federal agency has committed to pay the amount specified.

(2) A sufficient balance exists in the fund to support the request.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 31, Sec. 20.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4052.

The department shall keep a record of all expenditures against the moneys transferred to the fund for each project and any advances made pending federal reimbursement pursuant to subdivision (b) of Section 4051. Any unexpended balance for any project, either within three months after completion of the project or within three years from the transfer, whichever is earlier, shall be transferred to the credit of the fund from which the appropriation was made. The Department of Finance may approve an extension of the time allowed before a return transfer is required or require an earlier transfer to the credit of the fund from which the appropriation was made.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 31, Sec. 20.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------

4053.

Annually, on or before October 15, the department shall submit to the Department of Finance a report that reconciles, by project and character of appropriation, all of the following:

(a) Amounts transferred to the fund.

(b) Amounts expended from the fund.

(c) Advances made pending federal reimbursement as described in subdivision (b) of Section 4051.

(d) In cases of project savings or completion, or both, unexpended amounts transferred to the credit of the fund from which the appropriation was made, as provided in Section 4052.

(History: Added by Stats. 2019, Ch. 31, Sec. 20.   (SB 85)   Effective June 27, 2019.)
-------------------------------------------



PART 2. PROTECTION OF FOREST, RANGE AND FORAGE LANDS [4101. - 4789.7.]



  CHAPTER 1. Prevention and Control of Forest Fires [4101. - 4209.5.]



  ARTICLE 1. Definitions [4101. - 4104.]

4101.

“Person” includes any agency of the state, county, city, district, or other local public agency, and any individual, firm, association, partnership, business trust, corporation, limited liability company, or company.

(History: Amended by Stats. 1994, Ch. 1010, Sec. 207.   Effective January 1, 1995.)
-------------------------------------------

4102.

“State responsibility areas” means areas of the state in which the financial responsibility of preventing and suppressing fires has been determined by the board pursuant to Section 4125, to be primarily the responsibility of the state.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4103.

“Forest fire” means a fire burning uncontrolled on lands covered wholly or in part by timber, brush, grass, grain, or other flammable vegetation.

(History: Repealed and added by Stats. 1965, Ch. 1144.)
-------------------------------------------

4103.4.

“Open fire” means any fire, controlled or uncontrolled, including a campfire, burning outside of any structure, mobilehome, or living accommodation mounted on a motor vehicle. “Open fire” does not include portable lanterns designed to emit light resulting from a combustion process.

(History: Added by Stats. 1988, Ch. 270, Sec. 1.)
-------------------------------------------

4103.5.
